src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA
!!€gt-norm: Noun plural partitive ia
!!€ koiria: koira+N+Pl+Par
 +Pl+Par:%>i%>a NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

LEXICON NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ
!!€gt-norm: Noun plural partitive iä
!!€ kärsä: kärsä+N+Sg+Nom # trunk
!!€ kärsiä: kärsä+N+Pl+Par
 +Pl+Par:%>i%>ä NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

LEXICON NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA
!!€gt-norm: Noun plural partitive ita
!!€ tienoita: tienoo+N+Pl+Par
 +Pl+Par:%>i%>ta NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

LEXICON NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ
!!€gt-norm: Noun plural partitive itä
!!€ teitä: tie+N+Pl+Par
 +Pl+Par:%>i%>tä NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

LEXICON NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA
!!€gt-norm: Noun plural partitive ja
!!€ lepakkoja: lepakko+N+Pl+Par
 +Pl+Par:%>j%>a NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

LEXICON NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ
!!€gt-norm: Noun plural partitive jä
!!€ pyhäkköjä: pyhäkkö+N+Pl+Par
 +Pl+Par:%>j%>ä NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

!! And plural illative has few variants:

LEXICON NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN
!!€gt-norm: Noun plural illative ihin back
!!€ taloihin: talo+N+Pl+Ill
 +Pl+Ill:%>i%>hin NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>i%>hi  NOUN_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN
!!€gt-norm: Noun plural illative ihin front
!!€ näkyihin: näky+N+Pl+Ill
 +Pl+Ill:%>i%>hin NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>i%>hi  NOUN_FRONT_POSS    ;

LEXICON NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN
!!€gt-norm: Noun plural illative iin back
!!€ koiriin: koira+N+Pl+Ill
 +Pl+Ill:%>i%>in NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>i%>i  NOUN_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN
!!€gt-norm: Noun plural illative iin front
!!€ sieni: sieni+N+Sg+Nom # mushroom
!!€ sieniin: sieni+N+Pl+Ill
 +Pl+Ill:%>i%>in NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>i%>i  NOUN_FRONT_POSS    ;

LEXICON NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN
!!€gt-norm: Noun plural illative isiin back
!!€ sokea: sokea+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ sokeisiin: sokea+N+Pl+Ill
 +Pl+Ill:%>i%>siin NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT          ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>i%>sii  NOUN_BACK_POSS              ;

 +Use/NG:          NOUN_BACK_H_PLURALS_ARCHAIC ;


LEXICON NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN
!!€gt-norm: Noun plural illative isiin front
!!€ kevät: kevät+N+Sg+Nom # spring
!!€ keväisiin: kevät+N+Pl+Ill
 +Pl+Ill:%>i%>siin NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT           ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>i%>sii  NOUN_FRONT_POSS              ;

 +Use/NG:0         NOUN_FRONT_H_PLURALS_ARCHAIC ;


!! ## Possessive suffixes
!! Possessives come optionally after the case suffixes. For consonant final
!! cases the possessives assimilate or eat the final part of the case ending
!! or stem.
LEXICON NOUN_BACK_POSS
!!€gt-norm: Noun possessive back
!!€ taloni: talo+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1
!!€ talosi: talo+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2
!!€ talonsa: talo+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3
!!€ talomme: talo+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1
!!€ talonne: talo+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2
 +PxSg1:%>ni  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
 +PxSg2:%>si  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
 +PxSg3:%>nsa NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
 +PxPl1:%>mme NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
 +PxPl2:%>nne NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
 +PxPl3:%>nsa NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

LEXICON NOUN_FRONT_POSS
!!€gt-norm: Noun possessive front
!!€ tönöni: tönö+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1
!!€ tönösi: tönö+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2
!!€ tönönsä: tönö+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3
!!€ tönömme: tönö+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1
!!€ tönönne: tönö+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2
 +PxSg1:%>ni  NOUN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
 +PxSg2:%>si  NOUN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
 +PxSg3:%>nsä NOUN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
 +PxPl1:%>mme NOUN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
 +PxPl2:%>nne NOUN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
 +PxPl3:%>nsä NOUN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!! The possessive suffix of form -an, -än, attaches to some long vowel
!! stems:

LEXICON NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN
!!€gt-norm: Noun possessive an
!!€ taloaan: talo+N+Sg+Par+PxPl3
 +PxSg3:%>an NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
 +PxPl3:%>an NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

LEXICON NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN
!!€gt-norm: Noun possessive back en
!!€ tienookseen: tienoo+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg3
 +PxSg3:%>en NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
 +PxPl3:%>en NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

LEXICON NOUN_FRONT_POSS_EN
!!€gt-norm: Noun possessive front en
!!€ tiekseen: tie+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg3
 +PxSg3:%>en NOUN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
 +PxPl3:%>en NOUN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

LEXICON NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN
!!€gt-norm: Noun possessive än
!!€ tönöään: tönö+N+Sg+Par+PxPl3
 +PxSg3:%>än NOUN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
 +PxPl3:%>än NOUN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!! ## Noun clitics
!! Clitics can attach to any word-form, including one that already has a clitic.
!! Clitics do not modify the form they attach to and are simply concatenated to
!! the end.

LEXICON NOUN_BACK_CLIT
!!€gt-norm: Noun clitic back
!!€ talokaan: talo+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/kaan
          +Foc/han:%>han       # ;
 +Foc/han+Foc/kaan:%>han%>kaan # ;
      +Foc/han+Qst:%>han%>ko   # ;
   +Foc/han+Foc/pa:%>han%>pa   # ;
              +Qst:%>ko        # ;
      +Qst+Foc/han:%>ko%>han   # ;
     +Qst+Foc/kaan:%>ko%>kaan  # ;
      +Qst+Foc/kin:%>ko%>kin   # ;
       +Qst+Foc/pa:%>ko%>pa    # ;
        +Qst+Foc/s:%>ko%>s     # ;
           +Foc/pa:%>pa        # ;
   +Foc/pa+Foc/han:%>pa%>han   # ;
  +Foc/pa+Foc/kaan:%>pa%>kaan  # ;
   +Foc/pa+Foc/kin:%>pa%>kin   # ;
       +Foc/pa+Qst:%>pa%>ko    # ;
     +Foc/pa+Foc/s:%>pa%>s     # ;
          +Foc/kin:%>kin       # ;
  +Foc/kin+Foc/han:%>kin%>han  # ;
 +Foc/kin+Foc/kaan:%>kin%>kaan # ;
      +Foc/kin+Qst:%>kin%>ko   # ;
   +Foc/kin+Foc/pa:%>kin%>pa   # ;
         +Foc/kaan:%>kaan      # ;
 +Foc/kaan+Foc/han:%>kaan%>han # ;
 +Foc/kaan+Foc/kin:%>kaan%>kin # ;
     +Foc/kaan+Qst:%>kaan%>ko  # ;
  +Foc/kaan+Foc/pa:%>kaan%>pa  # ;

LEXICON NOUN_FRONT_CLIT
!!€gt-norm: Noun clitic front
!!€ tönökään: tönö+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/kaan
          +Foc/han:%>hän       # ;
 +Foc/han+Foc/kaan:%>hän%>kään # ;
      +Foc/han+Qst:%>hän%>kö   # ;
   +Foc/han+Foc/pa:%>hän%>pä   # ;
              +Qst:%>kö        # ;
      +Qst+Foc/han:%>kö%>hän   # ;
     +Qst+Foc/kaan:%>kö%>kään  # ;
      +Qst+Foc/kin:%>kö%>kin   # ;
       +Qst+Foc/pa:%>kö%>pä    # ;
        +Qst+Foc/s:%>kö%>s     # ;
           +Foc/pa:%>pä        # ;
   +Foc/pa+Foc/han:%>pä%>hän   # ;
  +Foc/pa+Foc/kaan:%>pä%>kään  # ;
   +Foc/pa+Foc/kin:%>pä%>kin   # ;
       +Foc/pa+Qst:%>pä%>kö    # ;
     +Foc/pa+Foc/s:%>pä%>s     # ;
          +Foc/kin:%>kin       # ;
  +Foc/kin+Foc/han:%>kin%>hän  # ;
 +Foc/kin+Foc/kaan:%>kin%>kään # ;
      +Foc/kin+Qst:%>kin%>kö   # ;
   +Foc/kin+Foc/pa:%>kin%>pä   # ;
         +Foc/kaan:%>kään      # ;
 +Foc/kaan+Foc/han:%>kään%>hän # ;
 +Foc/kaan+Foc/kin:%>kään%>kin # ;
     +Foc/kaan+Qst:%>kään%>kö  # ;
  +Foc/kaan+Foc/pa:%>kään%>pä  # ;


! shorthands (could have tests as well...)

LEXICON NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT
 +Pref-:- #              ;
      0   #              ;
      0   NOUN_BACK_CLIT ;

LEXICON NOUN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT
 +Pref-:- #               ;
      0   #               ;
      0   NOUN_FRONT_CLIT ;

LEXICON NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS
 0 NOUN_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
 0 NOUN_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;

LEXICON NOUN_FRONT_SINGULARS
 0 NOUN_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
 0 NOUN_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;

LEXICON NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS
 0 NOUN_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
 0 NOUN_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;

LEXICON NOUN_BACK_PLURALS
 0 NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
 0 NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;

LEXICON NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT
 0 NOUN_BACK_POSS    ;
 0 NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN ;
 0 NOUN_BACK_CLIT    ;
 0 #                 ;

LEXICON NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT
 0 NOUN_FRONT_POSS    ;
 0 NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN ;
 0 NOUN_FRONT_CLIT    ;
 0 #                  ;

LEXICON NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT
 0 NOUN_BACK_POSS    ;
 0 NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN ;
 0 NOUN_BACK_CLIT    ;
 0 #                 ;

LEXICON NOUN_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT
 0 NOUN_FRONT_POSS    ;
 0 NOUN_FRONT_POSS_EN ;
 0 NOUN_FRONT_CLIT    ;
 0 #                  ;

LEXICON NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT
 0 NOUN_BACK_POSS ;
 0 NOUN_BACK_CLIT ;
 0 #              ;

LEXICON NOUN_FRONT_POSS_OPT
 0 NOUN_FRONT_POSS ;
 0 NOUN_FRONT_CLIT ;
 0 #               ;

LEXICON NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL
 0 NOUN_BACK_POSS    ;
 0 NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN ;
