src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_Cmp
lainavuosi+N+Sg+Ess+Use/NG:laina#vuonna NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
poronhoitovuosi+N+Sg+Ess+Use/NG:poronhoito#vuonna NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
porovuosi+N+Sg+Ess+Use/NG:poro#vuonna NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
pulavuosi+N+Sg+Ess+Use/NG:pula#vuonna NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
puunsydän+N+Sg+Ess+Use/NG:puun#sydännä NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;
puolivuosi+N+Sg+Ess+Use/NG:puoli#vuonna NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ; ! exceptions.lexc EXCEPTIONS
budjettivuosi+N+Sg+Ess+Use/NG:budjetti#vuonna NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ; ! exceptions.lexc EXCEPTIONS
talvivuosi+N+Sg+Ess+Use/NG:talvi#vuonna NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ; ! exceptions.lexc EXCEPTIONS
